Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-929
Drainage improvements; damages; immunity.

Neither the county, the county board, nor the individual members thereof shall be liable for damages to or loss sustained by any lot or land owner by reason of their actions in the administration of sections 31-901 to 31-933 or for failure to function hereunder.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 29, p. 493.